Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB230.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 156.095 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The Kentucky Department of Education shall establish, direct, and maintain a
statewide program of professional development to improve instruction in the
public schools.
(b) By August 1, 2025, the department shall create a professional development
training schedule that shall include all state and federal required
professional development for certified personnel. The schedule may
encompass multiple years.
(c) Each local school district shall implement the professional development
training schedule created by the department. Certified personnel who
transfer from one (1) school district to another school district shall not be
required to duplicate previously completed required professional
development.
(d) If the state and federal required professional development cannot be
completed in a single school calendar day for a given year within the
professional development training schedule, an additional professional
development day shall be added to the school calendar for the sole purpose
of completing required professional development training by certified
personnel.
(e) By June 30, 2026, each local school district shall submit a report to the
department on implementation of the professional development training
schedule. By June 30 of each year thereafter, each local school district shall
submit a report of the status of professional development training within the
district, including but not limited to the amount of time necessary to provide
the required training and any recommended changes to the professional
Page 1 of 9
XXXX 12/30/2024 10:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 241
development training schedule.
(2) Each local school district superintendent shall appoint a certified school employee
to fulfill the role and responsibilities of a professional development coordinator
who shall disseminate professional development information to schools and
personnel. Upon request by a school council or any employees of the district, the
coordinator shall provide technical assistance to the council or the personnel that
may include assisting with needs assessments, analyzing school data, planning and
evaluation assistance, organizing districtwide programs requested by school
councils or groups of teachers, or other coordination activities.
(a) The manner of appointment, qualifications, and other duties of the
professional development coordinator shall be established by Kentucky Board
of Education through promulgation of administrative regulations.
(b) The local district professional development coordinator shall participate in the
Kentucky Department of Education annual training program for local school
district professional development coordinators. The training program may
include[,] but not be limited to[,] the demonstration of various approaches to
needs assessment and planning; strategies for implementing long-term,
school-based professional development; strategies for strengthening teachers'
roles in the planning, development, and evaluation of professional
development; and demonstrations of model professional development
programs. The training shall include information about teacher learning
opportunities relating to the core content standards. The Kentucky Department
of Education shall regularly collect and distribute this information.
(3) The Kentucky Department of Education shall provide or facilitate optional,
professional development programs for certified personnel throughout the
Commonwealth that are based on the statewide needs of teachers, administrators,
and other education personnel. Programs may include classified staff and parents
Page 2 of 9
XXXX 12/30/2024 10:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 241
when appropriate. Programs offered or facilitated by the department shall be at
locations and times convenient to local school personnel and shall be made
accessible through the use of technology when appropriate. They shall include
programs that: address the goals for Kentucky schools as stated in KRS 158.6451,
including reducing the achievement gaps as determined by an equity analysis of the
disaggregated student performance data from the state assessment program
developed under KRS 158.6453; engage educators in effective learning processes
and foster collegiality and collaboration; and provide support for staff to
incorporate newly acquired skills into their work through practicing the skills,
gathering information about the results, and reflecting on their efforts. Professional
development programs shall be made available to teachers based on their needs,
which shall include but not be limited to the following areas:
(a) Strategies to reduce the achievement gaps among various groups of students
and to provide continuous progress;
(b) Curriculum content and methods of instruction for each content area,
including differentiated instruction;
(c) School-based decision making;
(d) Assessment literacy;
(e) Integration of performance-based student assessment into daily classroom
instruction;
(f) Nongraded primary programs;
(g) Research-based instructional practices;
(h) Instructional uses of technology;
(i) Curriculum design to serve the needs of students with diverse learning styles
and skills and of students of diverse cultures;
(j) Instruction in reading, including phonics, phonemic awareness,
comprehension, fluency, and vocabulary;
Page 3 of 9
XXXX 12/30/2024 10:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 241
(k) Educational leadership; and
(l) Strategies to incorporate character education throughout the curriculum.
(4) The department shall assist school personnel in assessing the impact of professional
development on their instructional practices and student learning.
(5) The department shall assist districts and school councils with the development of
long-term school and district improvement plans that include multiple strategies for
professional development based on the assessment of needs at the school level.
(a) Professional development strategies may include but are not limited to
participation in subject matter academies, teacher networks, training institutes,
workshops, seminars, and study groups; collegial planning; action research;
mentoring programs; appropriate university courses; and other forms of
professional development.
(b) In planning the use of the four (4) days for professional development under
KRS 158.070, school councils and districts shall give priority to programs that
increase teachers' understanding of curriculum content and methods of
instruction appropriate for each content area based on individual school plans.
The district may use up to one (1) day to provide district-wide training and
training that is mandated by state or federal law. Only those employees
identified in the mandate or affected by the mandate shall be required to
attend the training.
(c) State funds allocated for professional development shall be used to support
professional development initiatives that are consistent with local school
improvement and professional development plans and teachers' individual
growth plans. The funds may be used throughout the year for all staff,
including classified and certified staff and parents on school councils or
committees. A portion of the funds allocated to each school council under
KRS 160.345 may be used to prepare or enhance the teachers' knowledge and
Page 4 of 9
XXXX 12/30/2024 10:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 241
teaching practices related to the content and subject matter that are required
for their specific classroom assignments.
(6) (a) The Kentucky Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall post on its web
page evidence-based suicide prevention awareness information, to include
recognizing the warning signs of a suicide crisis. The web page shall include
information related to suicide prevention training opportunities offered by the
cabinet or an agency recognized by the cabinet as a training provider.
(b) Every public school and public charter school shall provide two (2) evidence-
based suicide prevention awareness lessons each school year, the first by
September 15 and the second by January 15, either in person, by live
streaming, or via a video recording to all students in grades six (6) through
twelve (12 ). Every public school shall provide an opportunity for any student
absent on the day the evidence-based suicide prevention awareness lesson was
initially presented to receive the lesson at a later time. The information may
be obtained from the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or from a
commercially developed suicide prevention training program.
(c) 1. Each school year, a minimum of one (1) hour of high-quality evidence-
based suicide prevention training, including risk factors, warning signs,
protective factors, response procedures, referral, postvention, and the
recognition of signs and symptoms of possible mental illness, shall be
required for all school district employees with job duties requiring direct
contact with students in grades four (4) through twelve (12). The
training shall be provided either in person, by live streaming, or via a
video recording and may be included in the four (4) days of professional
development under KRS 158.070. As used in this subparagraph,
"postvention" means a series of planned supports and interventions with
persons affected by a suicide for the purpose of facilitating the grieving
Page 5 of 9
XXXX 12/30/2024 10:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 241
or adjustment process, stabilizing the environment, reducing the risk of
negative behaviors, and limiting the risk of further suicides through
contagion.
2. When a staff member subject to the training under subparagraph 1. of
this paragraph is initially hired during a school year in which the
training is not required, the local district shall provide suicide prevention
materials to the staff member for review.
(d) The requirements of paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection shall apply to
public charter schools as a health and safety requirement under KRS
160.1592(1).
(7) (a) By November 1 of each year, a minimum of one (1) hour of training on how
to respond to an active shooter situation shall be required for all school district
employees with job duties requiring direct contact with students. The training
shall be provided either in person, by live streaming, or via a video recording
prepared by the Kentucky Department of Criminal Justice Training in
collaboration with the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, the Kentucky
Department of Education, and the Center for School Safety and may be
included in the four (4) days of professional development under KRS
158.070.
(b) When a staff member subject to the training requirements of this subsection is
initially hired after the training has been provided for the school year, the
local district shall provide materials on how to respond to an active shooter
situation.
(c) The requirements of this subsection shall also apply to public charter schools
as a health and safety requirement under KRS 160.1592(1).
(8) (a) The Kentucky Department of Education shall develop and maintain a list of
approved comprehensive evidence-informed trainings on child abuse and
Page 6 of 9
XXXX 12/30/2024 10:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 241
neglect prevention, recognition, and reporting that encompass child physical,
sexual, and emotional abuse and neglect.
(b) The trainings shall be web based[web-based] or in person[in-person] and
cover, at a minimum, the following topics:
1. Recognizing child physical, sexual, and emotional abuse and neglect;
2. Reporting suspected child abuse and neglect in Kentucky as required by
KRS 620.030 and the appropriate documentation;
3. Responding to the child; and
4. Understanding the response of child protective services.
(c) The trainings shall include a questionnaire or other basic assessment tool upon
completion to document basic knowledge of training components.
(d) Each local board of education shall adopt one (1) or more trainings from the
list approved by the Department of Education to be implemented by schools.
(e) All school administrators, certified personnel, office staff, instructional
assistants, and coaches and extracurricular sponsors who are employed by the
school district shall complete the implemented training or trainings within
ninety (90) days of being hired and then every two (2) years after.
(f) Every public school shall prominently display the statewide child abuse
hotline number administered by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services,
the National Human Trafficking Reporting Hotline number administered by
the United States Department for Health and Human Services, and the Safe
Haven Baby Boxes Crisis Line number administered by the Safe Haven Baby
Boxes national organization or any equivalent successor entity.
(g) The requirements of this subsection shall also apply to public charter schools
as a health and safety requirement under KRS 160.1592(1).
(9) The Department of Education shall establish an electronic consumer bulletin board
that posts information regarding professional development providers and programs
Page 7 of 9
XXXX 12/30/2024 10:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 241
as a service to school district central office personnel, school councils, teachers, and
administrators. Participation on the electronic consumer bulletin board shall be
voluntary for professional development providers or vendors, but shall include all
programs sponsored by the department. Participants shall provide the following
information: program title; name of provider or vendor; qualifications of the
presenters or instructors; objectives of the program; program length; services
provided, including follow-up support; costs for participation and costs of
materials; names of previous users of the program, addresses, and telephone
numbers; and arrangements required. Posting information on the bulletin board by
the department shall not be viewed as an endorsement of the quality of any specific
provider or program.
(10) The Department of Education shall provide training to address the characteristics
and instructional needs of students at risk of school failure and most likely to drop
out of school. The training shall be developed to meet the specific needs of all
certified and classified personnel depending on their relationship with these
students. The training for instructional personnel shall be designed to provide and
enhance skills of personnel to:
(a) Identify at-risk students early in elementary schools as well as at-risk and
potential dropouts in the middle and high schools;
(b) Plan specific instructional strategies to teach at-risk students;
(c) Improve the academic achievement of students at risk of school failure by
providing individualized and extra instructional support to increase
expectations for targeted students;
(d) Involve parents as partners in ways to help their children and to improve their
children's academic progress; and
(e) Significantly reduce the dropout rate of all students.
(11) The department shall establish teacher academies to the extent funding is available
Page 8 of 9
XXXX 12/30/2024 10:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 241
in cooperation with postsecondary education institutions for elementary, middle
school, and high school faculty in core disciplines, utilizing facilities and faculty
from universities and colleges, local school districts, and other appropriate agencies
throughout the state. Priority for participation shall be given to those teachers who
are teaching core discipline courses for which they do not have a major or minor or
the equivalent. Participation of teachers shall be voluntary.
(12) The department shall annually provide to the oversight council established in KRS
15A.063, the information received from local schools pursuant to KRS 158.449.
Page 9 of 9
XXXX 12/30/2024 10:45 AM Jacketed